Utah statutes.
72-3-204.   State park access highways -- Hyrum State Park to Painted Rocks.

State park access highways include:

(1)  HYRUM STATE PARK.  Access to Hyrum State Park is at the pay gate in Cache County at 405 West 300 South in Hyrum and proceeds northerly on 400 West to State Highway 101.  No access road is defined.

(2)  IRON MISSION STATE PARK.  Access to Iron Mission State Park is at the parking area and museum in Iron County at milepoint 3.3 on State Highway 130 at 585 North Main St. in Cedar City.  No access road is defined.

(3)  IRON MISSION STATE PARK (OLD IRON TOWN HISTORIC SITE).  Access to Old Iron Town begins at the junction of a county road and State Highway 56, 19.0 miles west of Cedar City, and proceeds southwesterly 2.7 miles to the parking lot for Old Iron Town and is under the jurisdiction of Iron County.

(4)  JORDAN RIVER STATE PARK.  Access to Jordan River State Park is at the park entrance in Salt Lake County at milepoint 61.3 on State Highway 68 at 1084 North Redwood Road in Salt Lake City.  No access road is defined.

(5)  JORDANELLE STATE PARK (HAILSTONE MARINA).  Access to the Jordanelle State Park Hailstone Marina begins in Wasatch County at State Highway 40 and proceeds southeasterly on State Highway 319 a distance of 1.4 miles to the marina parking area at the park and is under the jurisdiction of UDOT.

(6)  JORDANELLE STATE PARK (ROCK CLIFF NATURE CENTER).  Access to the Jordanelle State Park Rock Cliff Nature Center begins in Wasatch County at State Highway 32 and proceeds northwesterly on a county road a distance of 0.6 miles to the parking area at the park and is under the jurisdiction of the county.

(7)  JORDANELLE STATE PARK (ROCK CREEK).  Access to Jordanelle State Park Rock Creek begins in Wasatch County at State Highway 189 and proceeds southerly on a county road a distance of 0.1 miles to the parking area at the park and is under the jurisdiction of the county.

(8)  KODACHROME BASIN STATE PARK.  Access to the Kodachrome Basin State Park begins in Kane County at State Highway 12 and proceeds southeasterly on a county road 10.1 miles to the parking area at Kodachrome Lodge and is under the jurisdiction of Kane County.

(9)  LOST CREEK STATE PARK.  Access to the Lost Creek State Park begins in Morgan County at Interstate Highway 84 and proceeds northeasterly on a county road a distance of 12.8 miles to the parking/boat launch area at the park and is under the jurisdiction of Morgan County.

(10)  MILLSITE STATE PARK.  Access to the Millsite State Park begins in Emery County at State Highway 10 and proceeds northwesterly on a county road (L122) a distance of 4.6 miles to the parking area at the park and is under the jurisdiction of Emery County.

(11)  MINERSVILLE STATE PARK.  Access to the Minersville State Park begins in Beaver County at State Highway 21 and proceeds northwesterly on State Highway 310 a distance of 0.3 miles to the visitor center/contact station at the park and is under the jurisdiction of UDOT.

(12)  NEWSPAPER ROCK STATE PARK.  Access to the Newspaper Rock State Park begins in San Juan County at State Highway 191 and proceeds southwesterly on State Highway 211 a distance of 12.4 miles to the parking area at the park and is under the jurisdiction of UDOT.

(13)  OTTER CREEK STATE PARK.  Access to the Otter Creek State Park is at the pay gate/contact station in Piute County at milepoint 6.4 on State Highway 22.  No access road is defined.

(14)  PAINTED ROCKS (YUBA EAST SHORE).  Access to the Painted Rocks Yuba East Shore begins in Sanpete County at State Highway 28 and proceeds westerly on a county road a distance of 2.0 miles to the parking/boat launch area at the park and is under the jurisdiction of Sanpete County.



Amended by Chapter 21, 2002 General Session

